District of Columbia statutes.
1-336.06

Sunset.

This part shall expire upon the occurrence of any of the following:

(1)

The Congress or President of the United States unambiguously states, by means including legislation, executive order, or written certification from the President to Congress, that the government of Iran has ceased to pursue the capabilities to develop nuclear weapons and support international terrorism;

(2)

The United States revokes all sanctions imposed against the government of Iran; or

(3)

The Congress or President of the United States affirmatively and unambiguously declares, by means including legislation, executive order, or written certification from the President to Congress, that mandatory divestment of the type provided for in this part interferes with the conduct of United States foreign policy.

Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-337, § 106, 56 DCR 939

History

For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 1042 to 1053 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 1042 to 1053 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).

Emergency Legislation